Washington statutes.
RCW 19.16.110

License required.

No person shall act, assume to act, or advertise as a collection agency or out-of-state collection agency as defined in this chapter, except as authorized by this chapter, without first having applied for and obtained a license from the director.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to require a regular employee of a collection agency or out-of-state collection agency duly licensed under this chapter to procure a collection agency license.

[ 1994 c 195 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 253 s 2.]